South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4787.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 5, Title 30 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 30-5-14. (A) A clerk of court or register of deeds shall not record any deed conveying title or any ownership interest in real property to the Chinese Communist Party or the People's Republic of China, or any citizen thereof.  Any deed recorded in contravention of this subsection is invalid. (B) For purposes of this section: (1) "Chinese Communist Party" includes all agencies, institutions, and instrumentalities of the Chinese Communist Party. (2) "People's Republic of China" includes all agencies, institutions, instrumentalities, and political subdivisions of the People's Republic of China. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----